Hawaii statutes.
[§346-14.5] Financial assistance advisory
council; established. (a) There is created within the department for
administrative purposes the financial assistance advisory council. The
financial assistance advisory council shall be composed of fifteen members
appointed by the director. The members of the financial assistance advisory
council shall serve at the pleasure of the director and without compensation.

(b) The financial assistance advisory council
shall have the function of rendering advice and information to the department
on matters relating to financial assistance programs including rendering advice
and information for the determination of the amount of benefit payments under
sections 346-52, 346-53, and 346-71, including but not limited to temporary
assistance to needy families (TANF), temporary assistance to other needy
families (TAONF), and general assistance to households without minor
dependents. The council shall be advisory and informational in nature only and
shall not have the power to adopt rules.

(c) The financial assistance advisory council
may request the assistance of professional facilitators and mediators as
necessary. [L 1998, c 127, §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next